Utah statutes.
10-17-104.   Sterilization deposit.

(1)  A sterilization deposit may be:

(a)  a portion of the adoption fee or purchase price of the pet, which will enable the adopter to take the pet for sterilization to a veterinarian with whom the animal shelter has an agreement that the veterinarian will bill the animal shelter directly for the sterilization;

(b)  a deposit that is:

(i)  refundable to the recipient if proof of sterilization of the animal within the appropriate time limits under Section 10-17-103 is presented to the animal shelter not more than three months after the date the animal is sterilized; and

(ii)  forfeited to the animal shelter if proof of sterilization is not presented to the animal shelter in compliance with Subsection (1)(b)(i); or

(c)  a deposit under Section 10-17-105.5 required for an owner to claim an unsterilized animal impounded at the animal shelter.

(2)  Sterilization deposits under Subsection (1) shall reflect the average reduced cost of a sterilization of an animal, based on the gender and weight of the animal, that is reasonably available in the area where the animal shelter is located, but the deposit may not be less than $25.

(3)  If a female dog or cat and her litter are transferred to one person, a sterilization deposit is required only for the female dog or cat.

(4)  All sterilization deposits forfeited or unclaimed under this section shall be retained by the animal shelter and shall be used by the animal shelter only for:

(a)  a program to sterilize animals, which may include a sliding scale fee program;

(b)  a public education program to reduce and prevent overpopulation of animals and the related costs to local governments;

(c)  a follow-up program to assure that animals transferred by the animal shelter are sterilized in accordance with the agreement executed under Section 10-17-103; and

(d)  any additional costs incurred by the animal shelter in the administration of the requirements of this chapter.

